Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1908.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 353.22.1 of Title 59, unless


there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. For the purpose of removing monopolistic barriers to


medicines and medical supplies, a prescription shall not be required


to purchase any non-narcotic medications, homeopathic treatments, or


medical supplies in this state.


B. It shall be unlawful for any state agency or official or


public or private health care payor to require any person to have a


prescription to purchase non-narcotic medications, homeopathic


treatments, or medical supplies.



Req. No. 3514 Page 1


C. Notwithstanding any other law, a pharmacist acting in a


reasonably prudent manner is not criminally or civilly liable or


subject to professional disciplinary action for selling non-narcotic


medications, homeopathic treatments, or medical supplies in


accordance with this section.


D. The State Board of Pharmacy may promulgate rules as


necessary to implement this section.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-3514 DC 1/15/2026 8:43:02 AM





























Req. No. 3514 Page 2